Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2326.07
Clerk of the district court; depositories; securities; list.

The clerk of the district court shall at all times keep and certify to the county board a complete and correct list and description of the securities furnished by any depository to secure the deposits. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1947, c. 269, § 7, p. 870;

Laws 1988, LB 370, § 15;

Laws 1988, LB 703, § 7;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 48;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 36;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 48.